Oklahoma, session 2026, SB784.
BE IT ENACTED BY THE PEOPLE OF THE STATE OF OKLAHOMA:


SECTION 1. NEW LAW A new section of law to be codified


in the Oklahoma Statutes as Section 1270 of Title 36, unless there


is created a duplication in numbering, reads as follows:


This act may be known and cited as the “Oklahoma Motor Vehicle


Consumer Protection Act”.



Req. No. 1153 Page 1


SECTION 2. NEW LAW A new section of law to be codified


in the Oklahoma Statutes as Section 1271 of Title 36, unless there


is created a duplication in numbering, reads as follows:


As used in this act:


1. “Administrative charges” shall include, but not be limited


to, the cost of:


a. file creation,


b. repair orders,


c. vehicle travel,


d. parts and vehicle identification,


e. software charges,


f. communication with vehicle owners and insurance


representatives and any other party involved in the


repair or total loss determination,


g. pre-repair charges,


h. prewashes,


i. COVID-19 cleaning or bio-cleaning,


j. charges related to pre-repair diagnostic scanning,


photographs, electronic communications, parts


identification, and preparation of a repair plan,


k. any charges for work that is not a repair procedure


for obtaining labor, parts, and materials,


l. securing removed parts,



Req. No. 1153 Page 2


m. relocating parts back in a vehicle determined to be a


total loss,


n. restocking fees, and


o. wrapping, tarping, and moving vehicles from different


locations;


2. “Consumer” or “responsible party” means the owner, an agent


of the owner, a family member of the owner, an employee of the


owner, insurance representative, or any other person who is or will


be responsible for charges incurred at a motor vehicle repair


facility as a result of repairs or charges incurred in determining a


total loss of a motor vehicle as provided for in Section 1250.8 of


Title 36 of the Oklahoma Statutes;


3. “Motor vehicle” means the same as defined in Section 1-134


of Title 47 of the Oklahoma Statutes;


4. “Motor vehicle repair facility” or “garage” means any


commercial entity engaged in the business or occupation of


performing repairs on a motor vehicle, including any repairs or


replacement of body parts, and any mechanical repairs;


5. “Service work” means all repairs, maintenance, painting,


exterior body work, part replacements, evaluation to determine a


total loss motor vehicle, pre-repair evaluation to determine


anticipated service work to be performed, and diagnostic testing of


a motor vehicle performed after the repair process has commenced;



Req. No. 1153 Page 3


6. “Storage rates” means all charges and fees related to the


motor vehicle repair facility retaining actual physical possession of


a motor vehicle during the time when the motor vehicle repair


facility exercises control, supervision, care, security, protection,


and responsibility over the motor vehicle; and


7. “Tear-down process” means the disassembly of a damaged motor


vehicle to the point that the motor vehicle repair facility can


identify the extent of the damage and generate an itemized estimate


for restoring the vehicle to its pre-loss condition.


SECTION 3. NEW LAW A new section of law to be codified


in the Oklahoma Statutes as Section 1272 of Title 36, unless there


is created a duplication in numbering, reads as follows:


A. No service work shall be performed by any motor vehicle


repair facility unless the motor vehicle repair facility obtains the


written consent or documented verbal consent of the customer or


responsible party for the fees, charges, and costs, not including


any applicable sales taxes, to be incurred by the customer or


responsible party prior to performing the service work.


B. Prior to performing the service work, the motor vehicle


repair facility shall:


1. Prepare a written estimate of the proposed service work with


an itemization of all fees, charges, and costs for the proposed


service work, not including any applicable sales taxes, and an


estimated date of the completion of the service work; and

Req. No. 1153 Page 4


2. Record on the written estimate the type of communication,


written or verbal, had with the customer or responsible party and


whether the customer or responsible party consented to the proposed


service work. The record shall include the date, time, manner of


consent, verbal or written, telephone number called to speak with


the customer or responsible party, if any, and the names of the


persons giving and receiving such consent.


C. The bill for the tear-down of a total loss vehicle shall not


exceed the market labor hourly rate set by the Insurance


Commissioner and shall not exceed four (4) hours. The four-hour


maximum total time of completion for the tear-down process shall not


be a flat rate charged by a motor vehicle repair facility, but shall


be the time limit allowed, when necessary, based upon the amount of


labor required and difficulty of the evaluation of the specific


motor vehicle being assessed. Prior to performing any of the tear-


down process, the motor vehicle repair facility shall provide a


written estimate to the customer or responsible party with an


anticipated duration of the tear-down process.


D. The market labor hourly rate, upon the effective date of


this act, shall be Sixty-five Dollars ($65.00) per hour. The


Insurance Commissioner shall adjust the market labor hourly rate,


with the first adjustment being made July 1, 2030, and every five


(5) years thereafter. The market labor hourly rate shall be set by



Req. No. 1153 Page 5


the Insurance Commissioner based on the market conditions in this


state.


E. Administrative charges shall not exceed the market labor


hourly billed rate pursuant to subsection C of this section and


shall not exceed four (4) hours. The four-hour maximum total time


of completion for the administrative charges shall not be a flat


rate charged by a motor vehicle repair facility, but shall be the


time limit allowed, when necessary, based upon the amount of labor


and necessary supporting functions required for the repair of the


specific motor vehicle being serviced.


SECTION 4. NEW LAW A new section of law to be codified


in the Oklahoma Statutes as Section 1273 of Title 36, unless there


is created a duplication in numbering, reads as follows:


A. The maximum daily storage rate allowed to be charged by a


motor vehicle repair facility or garage for each calendar day, for


the first ten (10) calendar days the vehicle is in the possession of


the motor vehicle repair facility or garage, are:


1. Single vehicle: motorcycle, automobile, or light truck up


to twenty (20) feet in length................................ $39.00


2. Single vehicle or combination of vehicles over twenty (20)


feet in length but less than thirty (30) feet in length...... $47.00


3. Single vehicle or combination of vehicles over thirty (30)


feet in length and up to eight (8) feet in width............. $55.00



Req. No. 1153 Page 6


4. Single vehicle or combination of vehicles over thirty (30)


feet in length and over eight (8) feet in width.............. $70.00


B. On the eleventh calendar day, storage fees may increase to


Seventy-five Dollars ($75.00) per calendar day.


C. Storage charges may be increased by twelve percent (12%)


every four (4) years. The increase shall be implemented by the


Insurance Commissioner.


D. Storage charges shall neither accrue nor be charged on motor


vehicles that are repaired.


SECTION 5. NEW LAW A new section of law to be codified


in the Oklahoma Statutes as Section 1274 of Title 36, unless there


is created a duplication in numbering, reads as follows:


A. Each motor vehicle repair facility shall provide written


invoices and respond to requests for invoices concerning the pickup,


release, or delivery of a motor vehicle on its premises within eight


(8) business hours.


B. All fees, charges, and costs, not including any applicable


sales taxes, for service work and storage, including minimum


charges, shall be provided to the vehicle owner in a stand-alone


document in writing of sufficient size and contrast to be clearly


seen and readable. The document shall be signed by the vehicle


owner and a copy of the signed document shall be provided to the


vehicle owner.



Req. No. 1153 Page 7


SECTION 6. NEW LAW A new section of law to be codified


in the Oklahoma Statutes as Section 1275 of Title 36, unless there


is created a duplication in numbering, reads as follows:


A. A motor vehicle repair facility shall not increase any


charges assessed by a wrecker or towing service licensed by the


Department of Public Safety for a motor vehicle delivered to the


motor vehicle repair facility and shall only pass on those charges


without any markup. The charges assessed by the wrecker or towing


service are considered a sublet item and the receipt of such is part


of the administrative charges.


B. The incurred fee may be charged for a possessory lien


process filing pursuant to Section 91 of Title 42 of the Oklahoma


Statutes if the following requirements have been met:


1. Documentation of the official filing pursuant to Section 91


of Title 42 of the Oklahoma Statutes has been provided to the motor


vehicle’s registered owner in accordance with Section 91 of Title 42


of the Oklahoma Statutes; and


2. Proof of notification that the official filing pursuant to


Section 91 of Title 42 of the Oklahoma Statutes has been provided to


the motor vehicle’s registered owner shall be documented and kept by


the filing person or business, showing the address of the motor


vehicle’s registered owner, date upon which notification was made,


and manner of notification made to the motor vehicle’s registered


owner.

Req. No. 1153 Page 8


SECTION 7. NEW LAW A new section of law to be codified


in the Oklahoma Statutes as Section 1276 of Title 36, unless there


is created a duplication in numbering, reads as follows:


Nothing in this act shall prevent an insurance company from


offering an incentive to an insured person to use a certain motor


vehicle repair facility or garage for repairs to a motor vehicle.


SECTION 8. It being immediately necessary for the preservation


of the public peace, health or safety, an emergency is hereby


declared to exist, by reason whereof this act shall take effect and


be in full force from and after its passage and approval.




60-1-1153 CAD 1/19/2025 5:43:15 AM

























Req. No. 1153 Page 9